Tennessee, session 114, HB1009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-704, is amended by deleting the
language "one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000)" wherever it appears and
substituting instead "two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1009
001468
- 1 -